Final_code/dictionary.dix
  <pardef n="/hE__n">
  			<e><p>
		<l>hE</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>hEM</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>WA</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>We</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>WI</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>WIM</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>hUz</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="singular"/><s n="1st person"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>ho</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>hoM</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>huA</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
  			<e><p>
		<l>hue</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="plural"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>huI</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="singular"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>huIM</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="plural"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>howA</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>howe</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="plural"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>howI</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="singular"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>howIM</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="plural"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>honA</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>hone</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>honI</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>hogA</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>hoMge</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="plural"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>hogI</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="singular"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>hoUzgA</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="1st person"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>hoUzgI</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="future"/><s n="singular"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="1st person"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>hokara</l>
			<r>hE<s n="verb"/><s n="conjunctive"/></r>
		</p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/jA__n">
			<e><p>
		<l>jA</l>
			<r>jA<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="perfect"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>jA</l>
			<r>jA<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="intimate"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>jAwA</l>
			<r>jA<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>jAwA</l>
			<r>jA<s n="verb"/><s n="habitual"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>gayA</l>
			<r>jA<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="masculine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>gaI</l>
			<r>jA<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="feminine"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>gae</l>
			<r>jA<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="plural"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>jAne</l>
			<r>jA<s n="verb"/><s n="infinitive"/></r>
		</p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="rah/a__n">
			<e><p>
		<l>a</l>
			<r>raha<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="perfect"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>a</l>
			<r>raha<s n="verb"/><s n="present"/><s n="imperative"/><s n="intimate"/><s n="2nd person"/><s n="singular"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>A</l>
			<r>raha<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="masculine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>I</l>
			<r>raha<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/><s n="feminine"/></r>
		</p></e>
			<e><p>
		<l>e</l>
			<r>raha<s n="verb"/><s n="past"/><s n="perfect"/></r>
		</p></e>
  </pardef>
  </pardefs>

	<e lm="hE"><i></i><par n="/hE__n"/></e>
	<e lm="jA"><i></i><par n="/jA__n"/></e>
